Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,177
Perfection of rights; right to withdraw.

(MBCA 13.23) (a) A shareholder
who receives notice pursuant to section 21-2,176 and who wishes to exercise
appraisal rights must sign and return the form sent by the corporation and,
in the case of certificated shares, deposit the shareholder's certificates
in accordance with the terms of the notice by the date referred to in the
notice pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(ii) of section 21-2,176. In addition,
if applicable, the shareholder must certify on the form whether the beneficial
owner of such shares acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the
date required to be set forth in the notice pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)
of section 21-2,176. If a shareholder fails to make this certification, the
corporation may elect to treat the shareholder's shares as after-acquired
shares under section 21-2,179. Once a shareholder deposits that shareholder's
certificates or, in the case of uncertificated shares, returns the signed
forms, that shareholder loses all rights as a shareholder unless the shareholder
withdraws pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(b) A shareholder who has
complied with subsection (a) of this section may nevertheless decline to exercise
appraisal rights and withdraw from the appraisal process by so notifying the
corporation in writing by the date set forth in the appraisal notice pursuant
to subdivision (b)(2)(v) of section 21-2,176. A shareholder who fails to so
withdraw from the appraisal process may not thereafter withdraw without the
corporation's written consent.

(c) A shareholder who does not sign and return the
form and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit that shareholder's share
certificates where required, each by the date set forth in the notice described
in subsection (b) of section 21-2,176, shall not be entitled to payment under
sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 177.
January 1, 2017